New York, session 2025-2026, A4289.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 915-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 915-a. Halal food restrictions. 1. In any city or county in this 4 state, including a city having a population of one million or more, each 5 public school shall provide Halal food to any student who has such a 6 dietary restriction or requirement at no cost to such student. 7 2. This section shall only apply to a city school district having a 8 Muslim population equal to or greater than fifteen percent thereof. The 9 Muslim population, for purposes of this section, shall include those 10 persons, adults and children, who are fully or partially of Muslim 11 descent and shall include all those persons and ethnic groups identified 12 as Muslim by the United States census bureau for purposes of the year 13 two thousand ten federal decennial census. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 16 ment and/or repeal of any rules or regulations necessary for the imple- 17 mentation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on 18 or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08708-01-5